Utah statutes.
50-2-7.   Telephone and telegraph companies deemed agents of vendors.

All telephone and telegraph companies employed to transmit such information or news shall be deemed to be process agents of such persons and corporations, and an offer to pay a reasonable price to such telephone or telegraph companies shall be equivalent to an offer to pay the same to the persons or corporations gathering and disseminating such information or news.

